Illinois, session 104th, SB1000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/1.1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 137.1)7    Sec. 1.1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "State Finance Act".9(Source: P.A. 86-109.)